Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2616
Returned assistive device; resale or subsequent lease; lease; enforcement.

(1) No assistive device returned by a consumer or assistive device lessor in this state or in any other state may be sold or leased again in this state unless full written disclosure of the reasons for return is made to any prospective buyer or lessee.

(2) No person may enforce the lease against the consumer after the consumer receives a refund.

Laws 1997, LB 802, § 16.